Tennessee, session 114, SB0190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 50, Chapter 1, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Employee" means a natural person who performs services for an
employer for valuable consideration, and does not include a self-employed
independent contractor;
(2) "Employer" means a person, association, or legal or commercial
entity receiving services from an employee and, in return, giving compensation of
any kind to such employee;
(3) "Health benefit plan" means health insurance coverage as defined in
§ 56-7-109; and
(4) "Health insurer" means a health insurance entity as defined in § 56-7-
109.
(b) On and after July 1, 2025, if an employer terminates the employment of an
employee who is known to the employer to be pregnant, and such employee was
covered by an employer-sponsored health benefit plan prior to termination, then:
(1) The employer shall not:
SB0190
000614
- 1 -

(A) Stop payment to the health insurer of the employer's share of
the cost to provide coverage of the former employee under the employer-
sponsored health benefit plan; or
(B) Request that the health insurer that issued the employer-
sponsored health benefit plan terminate the employee's coverage until the
employer has received a signed written statement pursuant to subdivision
(c)(1); and
(2) A health insurer shall not terminate the former employee's coverage
under the employer-sponsored health benefit plan based upon a request from the
employer unless such request is accompanied by proof of the employer's receipt
of the former employee's signed written statement described in subdivision (c)(1).
(c)
(1) An employee whose employment is terminated while the employee is
pregnant and covered under an employer-sponsored health benefit plan shall,
within thirty (30) days after the date the employee's pregnancy ends in childbirth
or otherwise, notify the employer using a signed written statement indicating the
date the pregnancy ended. The signed written statement may be submitted by
electronic means.
(2) If a former employee fails to notify the employer of the end of the
employee's pregnancy as required by subdivision (c)(1), then an employer may
bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover the employer's
costs to maintain continued coverage of the former employee under the
employer-sponsored health benefit plan from the date of termination of
employment.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000614